apertium-arg.arg.dix
<pardef n="recomend/ar_nd__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pri12pl_amos__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ar<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pimpi_ba__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>á</l>         <r>ar<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pimpi_ba_acc__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="indefi_e__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="indefi_o__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ar<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="futuro_re__cnjgt"/></e>
    
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ar<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="cond_ria__cnjgt"/></e>
    
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>         <r>ar<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="cond_rba__cnjgt"/></e>
    
  <e r="LR"><p><l>á</l>         <r>ar<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="cond_rba_acc__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prs12pl_emos__cnjgt"/></e>
  
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pis_ase__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pis_arai__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_cant/emos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_cant/atz__cnjgt"/></e>
  
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="inf_ar__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="ger_ando__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ar<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pp_u__cnjgt"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="recomiend/o_d__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>an</l>        <r>ar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prsrest_e__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_cant/a__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ar<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_cant/e__cnjgt"/></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="me/ter__vblex"> <!-- regular except for strong past participle -->
  <e>       <p><l>to</l>        <r>ter<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>tes</l>       <r>ter<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>ter<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ten</l>       <r>ter<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>ter<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pri12pl_emos__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>ter<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pimpi_ba__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>té</l>        <r>ter<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pimpi_ba_acc__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ti</l>        <r>ter<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="indefi_e__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ti</l>        <r>ter<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="indefi_o__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>ter<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="futuro_re__cnjgt"/></e>
    
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>        <r>ter<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="cond_ria__cnjgt"/></e>
    
  <e r="LR"><p><l>te</l>        <r>ter<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="cond_rba__cnjgt"/></e>
    
  <e r="LR"><p><l>té</l>        <r>ter<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="cond_rba_acc__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>ter<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prs12pl_amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ti</l>        <r>ter<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prs12pl_amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>ter<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prsrest_a__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>ter<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pis_ese__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ti</l>        <r>ter<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pis_erai__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>ter<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/e__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>ter<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/a__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>ter<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ti</l>        <r>ter<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>ter<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/etz__cnjgt"/></e>
  

  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>ter<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="inf_er__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>ter<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="ger_endo__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>t</l>         <r>ter<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="ger_indo__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r>ter<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pp_quiest/o__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ti</l>        <r>ter<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pp_u__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>te</l>        <r>ter<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pp_u__cnjgt"/></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="vend/er__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pri12pl_emos__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pimpi_ba__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>é</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pimpi_ba_acc__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="indefi_e__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="indefi_o__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="futuro_re__cnjgt"/></e>
    
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="cond_ria__cnjgt"/></e>
    
  <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="cond_rba__cnjgt"/></e>
    
  <e r="LR"><p><l>é</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="cond_rba_acc__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prs12pl_amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prs12pl_amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prsrest_a__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pis_ese__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pis_erai__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/e__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/a__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/etz__cnjgt"/></e>
  

  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="inf_er__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="ger_endo__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="ger_indo__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pp_u__cnjgt"/></e>
</pardef>

<e r="LR" lm="hibernar"> <p><l>hiviern</l>   <r>hibern</r></p><par n="recomend/ar_nd__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="acceder">         <i>acced</i><par n="vend/er__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="admitir">  <p><l>adme</l>      <r>adme</r></p><par n="me/ter__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="afrontar">        <i>afront</i><par n="recomend/ar_nd__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="alcordar">        <p><l>alcuerd</l>   <r>alcord</r></p><par n="recomiend/o_d__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="anyader">         <i>anyad</i><par n="vend/er__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="atender">  <i>atend</i><par n="vend/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="beber">           <i>beb</i><par n="vend/er__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="brendar">  <p><l>berend</l>    <r>brend</r></p><par n="recomend/ar_nd__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="brendar">         <p><l>briend</l>    <r>brend</r></p><par n="recomiend/o_d__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="comprender">      <i>comprend</i><par n="vend/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="confesar">        <i>confes</i><par n="recomend/ar_nd__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="correr">          <i>corr</i><par n="vend/er__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="colar">    <p><l>cuel</l>      <r>col</r></p><par n="recomiend/o_d__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="degollar">        <i>degoll</i><par n="recomend/ar_nd__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="demostrar">       <p><l>demuestr</l>  <r>demostr</r></p><par n="recomiend/o_d__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="depender">        <i>depend</i><par n="vend/er__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="dispertar"><p><l>despert</l>   <r>dispert</r></p><par n="recomend/ar_nd__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="despoblar">       <p><l>despuebl</l>  <r>despobl</r></p><par n="recomiend/o_d__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="emeter">   <p><l>eme</l>       <r>eme</r></p><par n="me/ter__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="encetar">         <i>encet</i><par n="recomend/ar_nd__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="encomendar">      <p><l>encomiend</l> <r>encomend</r></p><par n="recomiend/o_d__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="entender"> <i>entend</i><par n="vend/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="enterrar">        <i>enterr</i><par n="recomend/ar_nd__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="esferrar">        <p><l>esfierr</l>   <r>esferr</r></p><par n="recomiend/o_d__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="dispertar"><p><l>espert</l>    <r>dispert</r></p><par n="recomend/ar_nd__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="esmendar">      <p><l>esmiend</l> <r>esmend</r></p><par n="recomiend/o_d__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="enmerdar">      <i>enmerd</i><par n="recomend/ar_nd__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="goler">    <i>gol</i><par n="vend/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gubernar">        <p><l>gubiern</l>   <r>gubern</r></p><par n="recomiend/o_d__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="gubernar"> <p><l>guvern</l>    <r>gubern</r></p><par n="recomend/ar_nd__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="manifestar">      <p><l>manifiest</l> <r>manifest</r></p><par n="recomiend/o_d__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="meter">           <i>me</i><par n="me/ter__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="amenester"><p><l>menest</l>    <r>amenest</r></p><par n="vend/er__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="omitir">   <p><l>ome</l>       <r>ome</r></p><par n="me/ter__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="permeter"> <p><l>perme</l>     <r>perme</r></p><par n="me/ter__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="poblar">          <i>pobl</i><par n="recomend/ar_nd__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pretender">       <i>pretend</i><par n="vend/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="poblar">          <p><l>puebl</l>     <r>pobl</r></p><par n="recomiend/o_d__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="recontar"> <i>recont</i><par n="recomend/ar_nd__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="recorrer">        <i>recorr</i><par n="vend/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="repoblar">        <p><l>repuebl</l>   <r>repobl</r></p><par n="recomiend/o_d__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="rodar">           <i>rod</i><par n="recomend/ar_nd__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sobater">         <i>sobat</i><par n="vend/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sorprender">      <i>sorprend</i><par n="vend/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="subarrendar">     <p><l>subarriend</l><r>subarrend</r></p><par n="recomiend/o_d__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="temer">           <i>tem</i><par n="vend/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tronar">          <p><l>truen</l>     <r>tron</r></p><par n="recomiend/o_d__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="transmeter"><p><l>transme</l>  <r>transme</r></p><par n="me/ter__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="volar">           <i>vol</i><par n="recomend/ar_nd__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="errar">           <p><l>yerr</l>      <r>err</r></p><par n="recomiend/o_d__vblex"/></e>
